Oklahoma, session 2025, SB940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-9-100 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission shall implement a
statewide plan for the control, removal, and eradication of harmful
woody species on state-owned, -leased, or -operated land.
B. On or before January 1, 2026, a report shall be compiled and
presented to the Commission from the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, the Commissioners of the Land
Office, the Department of Wildlife Conservation, the Department of
Corrections, the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, the

Department of Transportation, and the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority
with a comprehensive report to determine the affected inventory and
subsequent plan to control, remove, or eradicate harmful woody
species from state-owned, -leased, or -operated properties. The
Commission shall assist in the administration of the agency’s plan
and develop any necessary programs to expand the capabilities of
each agency’s approach to control, remove, or eradicate harmful
woody specifies.
C. The agencies specified in subsection B of this section shall
electronically submit to the Legislature an annual report by
November 1, 2026, and each subsequent year by November 1, detailing
the progress of the control, removal, and eradication of harmful
woody species on state-owned, -leased, or -operated land.
D. As used in this section, “harmful woody species” means a
tree or shrub species that is rapidly encroaching into adjoining
lands and is likely to cause harm to the environment or economy.
Harmful woody species include, but are not limited to, Juniperus
virginiana (Eastern Redcedar), Juniperus scopulorum (Rocky Mountain
juniper), Juniperus monosperma (oneseed juniper), and Tamarix
ramosissima (salt cedar).
E. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission shall promulgate rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 940 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 940 Page 3